Washington statutes.
RCW 40.24.050

Agency use of designated address.

(1) A program participant may request that state and local agencies use the address designated by the secretary of state as his or her address. When creating a new public record, state and local agencies shall accept the address designated by the secretary of state as a program participant's substitute address, unless the secretary of state has determined that:

(a) The agency has a bona fide statutory or administrative requirement for the use of the address which would otherwise be confidential under this chapter; and

(b) This address will be used only for those statutory and administrative purposes.

(2) A program participant may use the address designated by the secretary of state as his or her work address.

(3) The office of the secretary of state shall forward all first-class mail to the appropriate program participants.

[ 1991 c 23 s 5.]